Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 8

Sale of Wine in Retail Food Stores

57-3-801. Referendum for sale of wine in retail food stores — Form of referendum — Time of election.

This part shall be effective in any jurisdiction that authorizes the sale of wine in retail food stores in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106; provided, however, that a jurisdiction must have held and passed a referendum authorizing retail package stores or held and passed a referendum authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises prior to holding a referendum authorized under this section.

If the county election commission receives the necessary petition requesting the referendum not less than forty-five (45) days before the date on which an election is scheduled to be held, except for referenda scheduled to be held with the regular November general election which shall be held pursuant to § 2-3-204, the county election commission shall include the referendum question contained in subsection (b) on the ballot.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) and § 57-3-101(a)(14) to the contrary, any municipality having a population of not less than five hundred seventy (570) nor more than five hundred seventy-nine (579), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that is located in any county having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand four hundred (29,400) nor more than twenty-nine thousand five hundred (29,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of wine at retail food stores within the corporate boundaries of such municipality. The referendum shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-106(b)(1).

At any such election, the question submitted to the voters shall be in the following form:

For legal sale of wine at retail food stores in (here insert name of political subdivision).

Against legal sale of wine at retail food stores in (here insert name of political subdivision).

A referendum described in this section may be held at any election prescribed in § 57-3-106(c)(1); provided, however, that no such referendum may be held prior to the regular November election in 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2016, ch. 1068, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

57-3-802. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part:

“Retail food store” means an establishment that is open to the public that derives at least twenty percent (20%) of its sales taxable sales from the retail sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption taxed at the rate provided in § 67-6-228(a) and has retail floor space of at least one thousand two hundred square feet (1,200 sq. ft.); and

“Wine” means the product of the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of fresh, sound, ripe grapes, with the usual cellar treatment and necessary additions to correct defects due to climatic, saccharine and seasonal conditions, including champagne, sparkling and fortified wine of an alcoholic content not to exceed eighteen percent (18%) by volume. No other product shall be called “wine” unless designated by appropriate prefixes descriptive of the fruit or other product from which the same was predominantly produced, or an artificial or imitation wine.

“Wine” does not mean alcohol derived from wine that has had substantial changes to the wine due to the addition of flavorings and additives.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1.

57-3-803. Retail food store wine licenses.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an additional class of licenses allowing the sale of wine at retail food stores is created. These licenses shall be known as “retail food store wine licenses” and shall be issued by the alcoholic beverage commission; provided, that licenses shall only be issued to a retail food store located in a county or municipality that has authorized the sale of wine at retail food stores by local option election pursuant to § 57-3-801 and has full-time law enforcement through a police or sheriff's department. The commission shall begin issuing the retail food store wine licenses on July 1, 2016, and prior to that date no retail food store may sell wine; however, the commission shall accept applications from retail food stores in jurisdictions that have authorized the sale of wine at retail food stores and begin processing such applications prior to that date. The retail food store wine license shall permit the licensee to receive, store, possess and sell wine at retail for consumption off the premises at the licensed retail food store subject to the restrictions in this part.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company or corporation desiring to sell wine to patrons or customers within the premises of a retail food store, in sealed packages only, and not for consumption on the premises shall make application to the commission for a retail food store wine license, which application shall be in writing and verified, on forms herein authorized to be prescribed and furnished; and the commission may, subject to the restrictions of this part, issue such retailer's license. A retail food store may enter into a franchise or management agreement with a person or entity to make wine sales at the premises of the retail food store. If the premises with respect to which the license is sought is owned by a person, partnership, limited liability company or corporation not the applicant, the application shall include the name and address of the owner. If the ownership of the premises should change after a license is granted, the licensee shall, within ten (10) days after becoming aware of such change in ownership, notify the commission in writing of the name and address of the new owner.

Any individual applicant applying for a retail food store wine license must be twenty-one (21) years of age or older and must not have been convicted of a felony subject to § 57-3-210(c).

The commission may issue a retail food store wine license to a person, partnership, limited liability company or corporation that is registered to do business in this state regardless of the residence of the ownership of such entity. No holder of a retail food store wine license, nor any person or entity having any interest in such license greater than ten percent (10%) shall have any interest as partner or otherwise, either direct or indirect, in a business licensed to engage in the sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages, including wine and beer licensed under § 57-3-202, § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207, § 57-3-217 or part 6 of this chapter. Nothing shall prohibit the holder of a retail food store wine license from having more than one (1) retail food store wine license. Nothing in this subdivision (b)(2)(B) shall be construed as prohibiting a retail food store that owns its own premises from either holding a retail food store wine license or from entering into a franchise or management agreement as provided in subdivision (b)(1).

Any wine sold by the holder of a retail food store wine license shall not exceed an alcoholic content of eighteen percent (18%) by volume.

Nothing in this part is intended or shall be construed to modify the provisions of title 57 that provide for the separation and independence of the classes of licenses available to manufacturers, wholesalers or retailers of alcoholic beverages or beer in this state.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2016, ch. 787, § 1.

57-3-804. Application fee and annual license fee.

Each applicant for a retail food store wine license shall pay to the commission a one-time, nonrefundable fee in the amount of four hundred dollars ($400) when the application is submitted for review. A retail food store wine license under this section shall not be issued until the applicant shall have paid to the commission the annual license fee of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250).

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1.

57-3-805. Location of licensed premises.

The premises of a retail food store wine license may be located in a municipality or the unincorporated areas of a county; provided, that such county or municipality has approved sales of wine by retail food stores by local option election pursuant to §57-3-801. If a county-wide referendum is approved under this part, the premises of a retail food store wine license may be located in any municipality that participated in the referendum regardless of the minimum population requirement for a municipality in §57-3-101.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2017, ch. 147, § 19.

57-3-806. Certificate to accompany application for license — Contents — Requirements for renewal of license — Limitation on location of licensed premises — Review of denial of certificate.

As a condition precedent to the issuance of a license under § 57-3-803, every applicant for a license under that section shall submit with the application to the commission a certificate signed by the county mayor or chair of the county commission in which the licensed premises are to be located if outside the corporate limits of a municipality or, if within a municipality, from the mayor or a majority of the commission, city council, or legislative body of the municipality, by whatsoever name designated, or if the municipality has no mayor, from the highest executive of the municipality. The issuance of a certificate must not be conditioned on the residency of the applicant, including, but not limited to, requiring the applicant to live within the county or municipality, or additional conditions not required by this section. The certificate remains valid unless there is a change of ownership or location. If either of these events occurs, a new certificate must be obtained prior to renewal.

The certificate must state:

That the applicant or applicants who are to be in actual charge of the business have not been convicted of a felony within a ten-year period immediately preceding the date of application and, if a corporation, that the executive officers or those in control have not been convicted of a felony within a ten-year period immediately preceding the date of the application; and

That the applicant or applicants have secured a location for the business which complies with all zoning laws adopted by the local jurisdiction, as to the location of the business.

Each applicant or officer identified in subdivision (b)(1)(A) must obtain and submit with the certificate a local and national criminal history record obtained from a third party using a multistate criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation. A criminal history record that indicates that the applicant or officer has not been convicted of a felony within the immediately preceding ten-year period serves as proof satisfactory that the applicant or officer has complied with subdivision (b)(1)(A).

Municipalities and counties are not authorized to limit the number of retail food store wine licenses issued within their jurisdictions.

In order to renew a retail food store wine license, the licensee must maintain a minimum of twenty percent (20%) of the licensee's sales taxable sales from the retail sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption taxed at the rate provided in § 67-6-228(a), such percentage to be calculated on an annual basis. The licensee shall keep sales and purchase records through accounting methods that are customary or reasonable in the retail food store business.

A retail food store wine licensee who fails to comply with subdivision (d)(1) in achieving the minimum required sales or in failing to keep adequate records shall have one (1) year to come into compliance. During this one-year period, the licensee shall work with the commission in creating a plan that would bring the licensee into compliance with this subsection (d).

Failure to comply after the one-year period shall result in the retail food store wine license being suspended or revoked by the commission.

In order to determine compliance with subdivision (d)(1), each retail licensee shall submit sales information to the commission in such form as the commission deems appropriate at the time the licensee applies for a license or upon renewal of such license. Each licensee shall provide the licensee's sales tax registration number to the commission. The commission is authorized to verify sales information if the commission deems it necessary with the department of revenue.

No retail food store wine license shall be issued to a retail food store located within a shopping center or other development unless documentation is provided to the commission that the retail food store has:

Not prohibited or restricted, through its lease or other agreement with the owner of the shopping center or development, the sale of wine or other alcoholic products by others at the shopping center or development; or

Waived any prohibition or restriction on the sale of wine or other alcoholic products, if such prohibition or restriction is in the lease.

If an applicant for a retail food store wine license is the owner of the shopping center or development, the applicant shall waive any prohibition or restriction on the sale of wine or other alcoholic products on any other entity that is located within that shopping center or development owned by the applicant. Nothing in this subsection (e) shall prevent the nonapplicant owner of a shopping center from imposing restrictions on its tenants through its leases or agreements.

An applicant may seek review of the denial of a certificate by instituting an action in the chancery court having jurisdiction over the municipality or county within sixty (60) days of the denial.

A failure on the part of the issuing authority to grant or deny the certificate within sixty (60) days of the written application for such shall be deemed a granting of the certificate.

The requirement imposed by this section to submit a certificate shall not be applicable to any applicant if:

The authority of the county or municipality charged with the responsibility to issue the certificate required herein shall have failed to grant or deny the certificate within sixty (60) days after written application for such certificate is filed; or

The applicant submits a final order of a court holding that the denial of the required certificate was unreasonable, as established by subsection (f).

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2016, ch. 697, § 1; 2016, ch. 1068, § 6; 2017, ch. 357, § 2; 2019, ch. 136, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “must not be conditioned” for “shall not be conditioned” in the second sentence, and added the last two sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 136, § 6. August 1, 2019.

57-3-807. Applicability of part 2 of this chapter to retail food store wine licenses.

Laws applicable to the issuance, renewal, suspension, and termination of retailer's licenses issued pursuant to part 2 of this chapter and the regulation of and operation by such license holders shall apply in the same manner to retail food store wine licenses and license holders unless this part expressly states otherwise.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1.

57-3-808. Prohibition against sales to minors — Identification required — Penalty.

A retail food store wine license holder engaging in the business regulated under this part, or any employee thereof, shall not make or permit to be made any sales to minors. Prior to making a sale of wine for off-premises consumption, the adult consumer must present to the license holder or any employee of the license holder a valid, government-issued document, such as a driver license or other form of identification deemed acceptable to the license holder that includes the photograph and birth date of the adult consumer attempting to make a wine purchase. Persons exempt under state law from the requirement of having a photo identification shall present identification that is acceptable to the license holder. The license holder or employee shall make a determination from the information presented whether the purchaser is an adult. In addition to the prohibition of making a sale to a minor, no sale of wine for off-premises consumption shall be made to a person who does not present such a document or other form of identification to the license holder or any employee of the license holder in a face-to-face transaction; however, it is an exception to any criminal punishment or adverse administrative action, including license suspension or revocation, for a violation of this section if the sale was made to a person who is or reasonably appears to be over fifty (50) years of age and who failed to present an acceptable form of identification.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2015, ch. 428, § 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-3-809. Prohibition against sale to intoxicated persons or persons accompanied by an intoxicated person.

No retail food store wine licensee shall sell any alcoholic beverages to any person who is visibly intoxicated, nor shall any retailer selling alcoholic beverages sell to any person accompanied by a person who is visibly intoxicated.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1.

57-3-810. Licensees exempt from certain restrictions — Licensee operating more than one licensed retail food store in state.

The restrictions in §§ 57-3-404(e) and (f), 57-3-210(g) and (h) and 57-3-204(b) shall not apply to retail food store wine licenses issued pursuant to this part.

A retail food store licensed to sell wine under this part shall not be limited to operating one (1) licensed retail food store business in this state; provided, however, that no retail food store wine licensee shall be permitted to combine its purchasing with any other retail food store wine licensee or retailer licensed under § 57-3-204.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1.

57-3-811. Hours for selling or giving away wine.

No retail food store shall sell, give away, or otherwise dispense wine except between the hours of eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Monday through Saturday and between ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Sunday.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2018, ch. 783, §§ 3, 4; 2018, ch. 783, §§ 3, 4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 783, effective April 20, 2018, rewrote the section which read, “A retail food store licensed to sell wine under this part shall only sell, or give away, wine during the same hours a licensed retailer sells or gives away wine pursuant to §57-3-406(e) and (h).”; and, effective January 1, 2019, added “and between ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and eleven o'clock p.m. (11:00 p.m.) on Sunday” to the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14. April 20, 2018, January 1, 2019.

57-3-812. Storage and delivery of wine — Purchase of wine from wholesaler.

A retail food store licensed to sell wine under this part shall not store any wine off of the licensed premises.

All deliveries of wine to a retail food store must be made by a licensed wholesaler through a common carrier, a contract carrier or on vehicles owned by the wholesaler. The deliveries shall only be made to the business address of the retail food store.

All purchases of wine from a licensed wholesaler by a retail food store must be conducted by designated managers on premises at each retail food store location where delivery will be made. A retail food store may have more than one (1) designated manager per location.

A wholesaler shall not take orders for wine from any retail food store employee other than a designated manager; provided, that an order does not include a preorder made by a person with a pending application for a retail food store wine license.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2017, ch. 443, § 3.

57-3-813. Prohibition against credit sales to licensee by wholesaler.

No wholesaler shall sell any product to a retail food store wine licensee on credit and payment for all sales to such licensee by a wholesaler shall be effected upon delivery of the product. In order to facilitate the implementation of this section, all payments to wholesalers by such licensees shall be made by electronic funds transfer, credit card, debit card, or such other method as approved by the commission that will facilitate full payment at or near the time of delivery.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2014, ch. 1015, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Senate Bill 2415/House Bill 2027 of the 108th General Assembly (enacted as Public Chapter 1015), which requires liquor-by-the-drink licensees to make payment to wholesalers upon delivery of the product, does not violate equal protection under the United States or Tennessee Constitutions. OAG 14-61, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 63 (6/17/14).

Licensed wholesalers of alcoholic beverages may extend up to 10 days’ credit to licensed retailers other than retail food store wine licensees. OAG 16-18, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (5/9/2016).

57-3-814. Licensee prohibited from sale of wine in connection with wholesale wine or alcoholic beverage business in state.

No holder of a retail food store wine license shall sell wine in connection with any business involved in the wholesale sale of wine or alcoholic beverages within this state.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1.

57-3-815. Wholesaler, manufacturer, winery, or nonresident seller's permit holder prohibited from providing certain services to licensee — Delivery of wine — Merchandising assistance.

No wholesaler licensed under § 57-3-203 and no manufacturer, winery, nonresident seller's permit holder or any employee, agent, representative or salesperson employed by or representing any such wholesaler, manufacturer, winery or nonresident seller's permit holder shall provide any services to or for the benefit of a retail food store wine licensee including, but not limited to, services involving shelving, dressing, displaying, or setting inventory owned or purchased by the retail food store licensee. A wholesaler may deliver wine to the premises of a retail food store wine licensee any time at which the wholesaler and the retail food store wine licensee's manager mutually agree in accordance with the ordinary and customary practices of the two industries, regardless of whether the retail food store wine licensee is open to the public, and may deliver wine to a location upon the licensed premises as directed by the retail food store wine licensee.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a wholesaler, including the wholesaler's agents, servants, or employees, may provide merchandising assistance to a retail food store wine licensee pursuant to this subsection (b). Wholesalers may build and stock wholesaler displays of wine on the premises of a retail food store wine licensee. Wholesaler displays must not be part of the retail food store's regular shelving. Wholesalers may replenish wholesaler displays for a maximum period of one (1) month after the initial display has been installed. Wholesalers shall not price the wholesaler displays and shall not provide any other services or things of value to the retail food store wine licensee.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2017, ch. 443, §§ 1, 2.

57-3-816. Permitted manager — Employees to obtain certification pursuant to responsible vendor training program for wine.

Any retail food store that is licensed to sell wine must have a permitted manager as prescribed in § 57-3-221 and that manager must work on the premises of the licensed retail food store. A retail food store may have more than one (1) manager per license.

All employees of a retail food store that is licensed to sell wine and is involved in selling the wine must obtain certification pursuant to the responsible vendor training program for wine in § 57-3-818.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1.

57-3-817. Wine tastings prohibited on premises — Licensee permitted to hold license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on premises — Requirements.

No retail food store shall conduct tastings of wine on the premises of the retail food store.

A retail food store that has a license pursuant to this part may also hold a license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on premises pursuant to chapter 4 of this title.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2016, ch. 830, § 1.

57-3-818. Responsible vendor training program — Report — Fees — Exceptions.

The commission shall create a responsible vendor training program for retail food store wine licensees and retailers licensed pursuant to § 57-3-204 similar to the responsible vendor training program established in chapter 5, part 6 of this title.

Except as provided in subsection (d), each retail food store wine licensee and retailer licensed in this state shall participate in the responsible vendor training program created under this section as a condition to having and maintaining such license.

Each retail food store and retailer shall be required to annually file a report stating the number of certified clerks employed by the licensee in the twelve (12) months preceding the date of the report. The list shall include the first and last name of each clerk. The licensee shall maintain records for each clerk sufficient to verify that annual training has been completed. Training shall be a minimum of one (1) hour annually. Each retail food store and retailer shall pay a fee as follows:

0-15 certified clerks—$150;

16-30 certified clerks—$200;

31-45 certified clerks—$250;

46-60 certified clerks—$300;

61-100 certified clerks—$350;

101-150 certified clerks—$400;

151-200 certified clerks—$450; and

$50.00 for each additional 50 certified clerks over 200.

The commission shall not require any licensee to participate or pay fees for both the responsible vendor training program created in this section and the program established in chapter 5, part 6 of this title. Participation in either program shall be deemed sufficient compliance.

This section shall not apply to employees of a retailer licensed under § 57-3-204 until July 1, 2016. Any employee of a retailer who has a valid permit under [former] § 57-3-204(c) on July 1, 2016, shall not be required to be certified pursuant to this section until that permit expires.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 1; 2019, ch. 136, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former section 57-3-204(c), referred to in this section, expired effective July 1, 2016.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (c) which read: “Each retail food store wine licensee and retailer shall pay an annual fee based on the number of certified clerks existing at the time the licensee applies to the commission for certification under the responsible vendor training program. The fee shall be as follows:”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 136, § 6. August 1, 2019.

57-3-819. Prohibition against sale or gift of wine on certain holidays.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a retail food store wine licensee shall not sell or give away wine on Christmas, Thanksgiving, or Easter.

Acts 2018, ch. 1010, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1010, § 4. May 21, 2018.